Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Chapter 1 Guardianships and Conservatorships Generally
34-1-123. Summons to appear for abuse, mismanagement or failure to perform — Removal — Submission of matter to district attorney general's office.

The court in its discretion may summon a fiduciary to appear before the court and may, if cause be shown, remove the fiduciary for any abuse, mismanagement, neglect or failure to perform the duties of fiduciary as set forth in this chapter, and chapters 2 and 3 of this title. If the court determines title 39, chapter 14, may apply to any fiduciary, the court in its discretion may submit the matter to the district attorney general's office.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 24; T.C.A. §34-11-123.

Cross-References. Duties of county clerk, §18-6-106.

Fiduciary bond, §34-1-105.

Sentence of imprisonment operates as a removal from office, §40-20-115.

Surety of guardian, §§29-33-107 —29-33-115.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 80.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

34-1-124. No fiduciary appointed — Expunction of record.

If an action for the appointment of a fiduciary is brought but no fiduciary is appointed, the court may for good cause enter an order permitting expunction of the record.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 25; T.C.A. §34-1-124.

34-1-125. Attorney ad litem.

The court shall appoint an attorney ad litem to represent the respondent on the respondent's request, upon the recommendation of the guardian ad litem or if it appears to the court to be necessary to protect the rights or interests of the respondent. The attorney ad litem shall be an advocate for the respondent in resisting the requested relief.

The cost of the attorney ad litem shall be charged against the assets of the respondent.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 26; T.C.A. §34-11-125.

34-1-126. Finding of disablement and need of assistance prerequisite for appointment of fiduciary.

The court must find by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is fully or partially disabled and that the respondent is in need of assistance from the court before a fiduciary can be appointed.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 27; T.C.A. §34-11-126.

Attorney General Opinions. There is no conflict between the surrogate decision making provisions of Title 33 and the conservatorship provisions of Title 34 with respect to the standard used to determine whether an individual is able to make his or her life choices, OAG 05-157 (10/14/05), 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 159.

34-1-127. Least restrictive alternative to be imposed.

The court has an affirmative duty to ascertain and impose the least restrictive alternatives upon the person with a disability that are consistent with adequate protection of the person with a disability and the property of the person with a disability.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 28; T.C.A. §34-11-127; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 42, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. There is no conflict between the surrogate decision making provisions of Title 33 and the conservatorship provisions of Title 34 with respect to the standard used to determine whether an individual is able to make his or her life choices, OAG 05-157 (10/14/05).

34-1-128. Duties of court clerk — Records — Index — Deadlines — Notices and summons.

The clerk shall maintain on all guardianship and conservatorship cases the same type docket books, files, minute books, and other records as in all other cases. In addition, the clerk shall maintain an appropriate index or tickler so that reporting deadlines established in §§34-1-110 and34-1-111 and the like are easily ascertainable. The clerk shall issue the notices and summons described in §§34-1-110 and34-1-111 to each delinquent fiduciary.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 29; T.C.A. §34-11-128.

Cross-References. Duties of county clerk, §18-6-106.

Proceedings by sureties to be released, title 29, ch. 33.

34-1-129. Letters of conservatorship or guardianship — Limited.

Upon the entry of the order appointing a fiduciary and the submission of a bond consistent with the order, the clerk shall issue letters of conservatorship or letters of guardianship. The letters of conservatorship or guardianship shall either:

Recite the specific powers removed from the minor or person with a disability and transferred to the fiduciary; or

Have attached to them the order or orders of the court specifying the powers removed from the minor or person with a disability and transferred to the fiduciary. If the fiduciary has been granted less than full authority over the person and property of the minor or person with a disability in the order of appointment, the clerk shall mark the letters prominently with the term “LIMITED”.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 30; T.C.A. §34-11-129; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-130. Forms or instructions — Inventory, receipts and expenditures.

The clerk may prescribe forms or instructions as to the manner in which a fiduciary may render its inventory, receipts, and expenditures.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 31; T.C.A. §34-11-130.

34-1-131. Examination of annual accounting — Report to judge.

The clerk shall examine the annual accounting of the fiduciary and make a report on the accounting to the judge.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 32; T.C.A. §34-11-131.

34-1-132. Appointment of emergency guardian or conservator.

If the court finds that compliance with the procedures of this title will likely result in substantial harm to the respondent's health, safety, or welfare, and that no other person, including an agent acting under the Health Care Decision Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 11, part 18, or a person acting under the Durable Powers of Attorney for Healthcare Act, compiled in chapter 6, part 2 of this title or a living will pursuant to title 32, chapter 11, appears to have authority to act, willingness to act, and is acting in the best interests of the respondent in the circumstances, then the court, on petition by a person interested in the respondent's welfare, may appoint an emergency guardian or conservator whose authority may not exceed sixty (60) days and who may exercise only the powers specified in the order. Immediately upon receipt of the petition for an emergency guardianship or conservatorship, the court shall appoint an attorney ad litem to represent the respondent in the proceeding. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), reasonable notice of the time and place of a hearing on the petition shall be given to the respondent and any other person as the court directs.

An emergency guardian or conservator may be appointed without notice to the respondent and the attorney ad litem only if the court finds upon a sworn petition that the respondent will be substantially harmed before a hearing on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an emergency guardian or conservator without notice to the respondent, the respondent shall be given notice of the appointment within forty-eight (48) hours after the appointment. The court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment within five (5) days after the appointment.

Appointment of an emergency guardian or conservator, with or without notice, is not a determination of the respondent's incapacity.

The court may remove an emergency guardian or conservator at any time. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to investigate the circumstances. An emergency guardian or conservator shall make any report the court requires. In other respects, the provisions of this title concerning guardians or conservators apply to an emergency guardian or conservator.

The time periods set forth above in this section are mandatory and not directory. Failure to comply with those provisions shall void any emergency appointment and remove the authority previously granted to an emergency fiduciary.

Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-133. Expedited limited healthcare fiduciary.

If the respondent is under hospitalization in a hospital as those terms are defined in title 68, chapter 11, part 2, and no other person, including an agent acting under the Healthcare Decision Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 11, part 18, a person acting under the Durable Powers of Attorney for Healthcare Act, compiled in chapter 6, part 2 of this title, or a living will under title 32, chapter 11, part 1 appears to have the authority and willingness to act and is acting in the best interest of the respondent, the court on petition of a person interested in the respondent's welfare may appoint an expedited limited healthcare fiduciary whose authority is for the limited purpose of consenting to discharge, transfer, and admission and consenting to any financial arrangements or medical care necessary to affect such discharge, transfer or admission to another healthcare facility and whose authority may not exceed sixty (60) days. Immediately upon the receipt of the petition for an expedited limited healthcare fiduciary, the court shall appoint an attorney ad litem to represent the respondent in the proceeding. In expediting the appointment of an expedited limited healthcare fiduciary, the court may vary the time periods for hearings including but not limited to the minimum number of days before a hearing under § 34-1-108 or the number of days before appointment of a guardian ad litem under § 34-1-107 or other time periods, but shall not vary requirements as necessary to determine the respondent is in need of a fiduciary.

The court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment within five (5) days of the appointment.

Appointment of an expedited limited healthcare fiduciary is not a determination of the respondent's incapacity.

The court may remove an expedited limited healthcare fiduciary at any time.

The time periods set forth in this section are mandatory and not directory. Failure to comply with those provisions shall void any expedited appointment and remove the authority previously granted to the expedited limited healthcare fiduciary.

Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.